Hawaii, session 2026, SB3040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 134C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title to read as follows: "[[]CHAPTER 134C[]] OFFICE OF GUN VIOLENCE [AND VIOLENT CRIMES COMMISSION] PREVENTION" SECTION 2.  Section 134C-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§134C-1[]  Gun] Office of gun violence [and violent crimes commission;] prevention; established.  (a) There is established the office of gun violence [and violent crimes commission] prevention that shall be placed within the department of the attorney general for administrative purposes only. (b)  The administrative head of the office shall be a director, who shall be nominated and appointed by the governor.  The office may employ analysts, grant writers, and other staff necessary for the purposes of the office." SECTION 3.  Section 134C-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§134C-3[]  Gun] Office of gun violence [and violent crimes commission;] prevention; powers and duties.  (a)  The purpose of the office of gun violence [and violent crimes commission] prevention shall be to [address] develop comprehensive strategies to prevent and minimize the risk of various types of gun violence [and violent crimes] in [Hawaii.] the State, including suicide, mass shootings, and other forms of gun violence. (b) The [gun violence and violent crimes commission shall provide coordination, facilitation, and planning among] office may coordinate with state and county agencies, federal agencies, and other partners as appropriate to carry out its purpose. (c) The [gun violence and violent crimes commission shall endeavor to:] office shall: (1)  [Identify] Collect relevant data that may be used to inform strategies to reduce gun violence [and violent crimes;], including from law enforcement agencies and other governmental entities; provided that the office shall redact and keep confidential any information that directly or indirectly identifies specific names or individuals; (2)  Identify areas in which relevant data that may be valuable is not available[;] and endeavor to collect the data; [(3)  Maximize the sharing between the agencies represented on the commission and other appropriate stakeholders of data relevant to reducing gun violence and violent crimes; and (4)] (3)  [Coordinate and conduct research on gun violence and violent crimes.] Analyze relevant data, and build and maintain the capacity for that analysis; and (4)  Develop programs and make recommendations to the governor and legislature to prevent and minimize the risk of gun violence in the State. (d) The [gun violence and violent crimes commission] office may work with and engage stakeholders for the purposes of this chapter. (e) The [gun violence and violent crimes commission shall submit a] office shall report [of] its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature [no later than forty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2022 and each regular session thereafter], the several counties, and various stakeholders on [policy relating to preventing] the office's strategies to prevent and minimize the risk of gun violence [and violent crimes]." SECTION 4.  Section 134C-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["§134C-2  Gun violence and violent crimes commission; membership.  (a)  The attorney general or the attorney general's designee shall coordinate and serve as the chair of the gun violence and violent crimes commission. (b)  The following individuals, or their designees, shall serve as members of the gun violence and violent crimes commission: (1)  The chief justice of the supreme court of Hawaii; (2)  The director of health; (3)  The director of law enforcement; (4)  A county prosecuting attorney to be selected by the chair of the commission; (5)  The public defender; (6)  The chief of police of each county; (7)  The administrator of the Hawaii state hospital; (8)  The dean of the college of social sciences at the University of Hawaii at Manoa; (9)  The dean of the John A. Burns school of medicine; (10)  One representative from a group that advocates for stricter gun safety laws; and (11)  One representative from a firearm advocacy group. (c)  The chair of the gun violence and violent crimes commission may request the participation or input of experts in gun violence and violent crimes; county, state, and federal officials; members of the public; and other persons as necessary. (d)  The members of the gun violence and violent crimes commission shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in carrying out their duties."] SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office of gun violence prevention for: (1)  The establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) director position; and (2)  Operating costs and equipment, including equipment necessary for analyzing relevant data relating to gun violence. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of the attorney general for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000; provided that section 5 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.